Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1728.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ST. PAUL; CHS FIELD IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $8,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of St. Paul to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip improvements at CHS Field. This appropriation includes money for upgrades and improvements to the facility's infrastructure to meet Major League Baseball ballpark requirements, including construction of a new locker room, enhanced visitor amenities, and for environmental remediation of contaminated soil. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $8,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end